vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Vận chuyển vật tư: Băng chuyền; Vận thăng & Cần trục; Tấm nâng và bệ bốc dỡ hàng
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Χειρισμός υλικών: Μεταφορείς; Ανελκυστήρες & ανυψωτικά; Παλέτες & πλατφόρμες φόρτωσης
da: Erhverv og industri > Materialehåndtering: Transportører; Hejseværk; Paller og læsseplatforme
en: Business & Industrial > Material Handling: Conveyors; Lifts & Hoists; Pallets & Loading Platforms
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Materialbeförderung: Förderanlagen; Aufzüge & Hebeeinrichtungen; Paletten & Ladeflächen
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การขนถ่ายวัสดุ: อุปกรณ์ลำเลียง; ลิฟท์และเครื่องยก; แพเลทและเพลตฟอร์มสำหรับการบรรทุก
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Manipuliranje z materialom: Transporterji; Dvigala in dvižne naprave; Palete in nakladalne ploščadi
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Materiaalbehandeling: Transportbanden; Takelen en heffen; Pallets en laadplatforms
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Manipulation de matériel: Convoyeurs; Ascenseurs et monte-charge; Palettes et plates-formes de chargement
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Manipularea materialelor: Transportoare; Ascensoare și elevatoare; Paleți și platforme de încărcare
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Manipulácia s materiálom: Dopravníky; Výťahy a kladkostroje; Palety a nakladacie plošiny
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 運搬: 運搬装置; リフト・ホイスト; パレット・荷台
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Manipulace s materiálem: Dopravníkové pásy; Zvedací zařízení; Palety a nakládací plošiny
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Погрузо-разгрузочные операции: Конвейеры; Подъемные механизмы; Поддоны и погрузочные платформы
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 物料處理: 運送機; 升降機和吊機; 升降平台/棧板
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Materiaalien käsittely: Kuljettimet; Hissit ja nostimet; Trukki- ja kuormalavat
es: Economía e industria > Manipulación de materiales: Cintas transportadoras; Izado y subida; Plataformas de carga y palés
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medžiagų tvarkymas: Konvejeriai; Keltuvai ir gervės; Padėklai ir krovimo platformos
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 材料处理: 输送机; 起重设备; 货板与装卸货平台
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Anyagkezelés: Szállítószalagok; Felvonók és emelők; Raklapok és rakodóplatformok
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Manuseamento de material: Transportadores; Elevadores e guindastes; Paletes e plataformas de carga
sv: Företag och industri > Materialhantering: Rullband; Lyftanordningar; Pall- och lastningsplattformar
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Manuseio de materiais: Transportadoras; Içamento; Plataformas de carga e pallets
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Товаро-разтоварни операции: Транспортьори; Асансьори и подемници; Палети и товарни платформи
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 자재 관리: 컨베이어; 리프트/호이스트; 팰릿/적재 플랫폼
nb: Forretninger og industri > Materialhåndtering: Samlebånd; Heiser og løftere; Paller og lasteplattformer
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Malzeme Taşıma: Konveyörler; Asansörler ve Kaldıraçlar; Paletler ve Yükleme Platformları
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Transport materiałów: Przenośniki; Narzędzia do wciągania i podnoszenia; Palety i platformy załadowcze
it: Commercio e industria > Movimentazione di materiali: Nastri trasportatori; Elevatori e paranchi; Pianali di carico e pallet
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Rukovanje materijalom: Transporteri; Dizala i dizalice; Palete i platforme za utovar